trmorph.xfst
read lexc trmorph.lexc
define Lexicon;

!
! Define some useful character classes
!

! Vowels
define Vf   e | i | ö | ü | E | İ | Ö | Ü | î | Î | %^sFRV | %^sFUV;
define Vb   a | ı | o | u | A | I | O | U | â | Â | û | Û | %^sBRV | %^sBUV;
define Vh   i | ü | ı | u | İ | Ü | I | U | î | Î | û | Û | %^si | %^sü | %^sı | %^su;
define Vl   e | ö | a | o | E | Ö | A | O | â | Â | %^se | %^sö | %^sa | %^so;
define Vfr  ö | ü | Ö | Ü | %^sFRV;
define Vfu  e | i | E | İ | î | Î | %^sFUV;
define Vbr  o | u | O | U | û | Û | %^sBRV;
define Vbu  a | ı | A | I | â | Â | %^sBUV;
define Vowel  Vf | Vb;
define Vbuf %^%(I%) | %^%(A%);
define Vpal %^pA | %^pI | %^pO | %^pU;
define Vxx  %^A | %^I ;
define Vsilent %^sFRV | %^sFUV | %^sBRV | %^sBUV ; 
define Vall Vowel | Vxx | Vpal; ! except buffer vowels

! Consonants
define ConsV b | d | c | g | v | z | j | f | ğ | l | m | n | r | w | y | 
           B | D | C | G | V | Z | J | F | Ğ | L | M | N | R | W | Y | %^sVC;
define ConsUV p | t | ç | k | f | s | ş | h | 
            P | T | Ç | K | F | S | Ş | H | %^sUC;
define Cons  ConsV | ConsUV;
define ConsBuf %^%(y%) | %^%(s%) | %^%(ş%) | %^%(n%);
define ConsXX    %^c | %^p | %^t | %^k | %^g | %^K | %^D | %^C | %@LN ;
define ConsSilent %^sVC |  %^sUC;
define ConsAll  Cons | ConsXX ; ! except buffers

! Intermediate symbols with no surface forms
define Boundary %@MB | %@RB | %@dB %@APOS; 
define IntSym   Boundary | %@NCOMP | %@opt3;

!
! Delete apostrophe  if it is followed by null morphemes
! Replace it with acceptable symbols 
! 
! NOTE: for generation it is better to limit these to only one.
!
define AposSym %'|%’;

define replaceApos %@APOS -> 0 || _ Boundary+ .#.
               .o. %@APOS -> AposSym;

!
! Replace @dB `digit boundary' with space or nothing
!
! we allow insertion of spce anywhere, or lack of it between the
! `digits'.
!

define NumberSpace      %@dB  -> 0    || _ %@RB
                    .o. %@dB (->) " "
                    .o. %@dB  -> 0;

!
! Numeric (silent) phonemes
!
!
! We add `silent' phonemes to the end of the numeric forms so that
! they inflect correctly with regard to vowel harmony, buffer deletion
! and voicing assimilation.
!

define NumericInsSilentP [..] -> %^sBRV %^sVC || %0^{12,14} ./. %@tSep  _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sBUV %^sVC || %0^{9,11}  ./. %@tSep  _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sBRV %^sVC || %0^{6,8}   ./. %@tSep  _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sFUV %^sVC || %0^{3,5}   ./. %@tSep  _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sFRV %^sVC || %0^2      _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sBRV %^sVC || [1|3] %0  _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sFUV       || 2 %0      _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sBUV %^sUC || 4 %0      _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sFUV       || 5 %0      _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sBUV %^sUC || 6 %0      _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sFUV %^sUC || 7 %0      _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sFUV %^sVC || 8 %0      _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sBUV %^sVC || 9 %0      _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sBUV %^sVC || %0        _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sFUV %^sVC || 1         _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sFUV       || 2         _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sFRV %^sUC || [3|4]     _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sFUV %^sUC || 5         _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sBUV       || 6         _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sFUV       || 7         _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sFUV %^sVC || 8         _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sBRV %^sVC || 9         _ %@RB ;

!
!   Numeric separator
!
! For now, the following is the official rules, inserting comma for
! decimal separator and dot for thousand separator. These are likely
! to be wrong for not-so-official documents, such as scientific texts
! and web corpora.
!

define NumericSeparator     %@tSep -> "."   
                        .o. %@dSep -> "," ;

!
! This part deals with the intermediate symbol @NCOMP inserted 
! in surface forms. In particular, if @NCOMP is followed by plural
! suffix lAr, it is moved after the plural suffix, if it is followed
! by the composite suffix lArI, it is deleted. The other cases where
! (s)I is deleted handled separately below.
!
! TODO: there is some double work done in parts of this rule

define CompNoun [ %^%(s%) %^I -> 0 || _ %@NCOMP Boundary l %^A r ]
           .o.  [ l %^A r -> l %^A r %@MB %^%(s%) %^I || %@NCOMP Boundary _ %@MB ]
           .o.  [ %^%(s%) %^I %@MB l %^A r -> l %^A r %@MB %^%(s%) %^I || (%@NCOMP) Boundary (%') _ %@MB ]
           .o.  [ %@NCOMP -> 0 ];

!
! (s)I deletion
!
!
! The morpheme (s)I is deleted in some contexts. What is deleted is 
! not clear, but we model such that (s)I gets deleted 
! - before another (s)I
! - before lAr
! - before lArI
! - after lI, sIz, CI
!

define DeleteSI  %^%(s%) %^I -> 0 ||          _ Boundary %^%(s%) %^I Boundary,
                                              _ Boundary l %^A r %^I Boundary,
                                              _ Boundary [ l %^I | 
                                                           l %^I k | 
                                                           s %^I z | 
                                                           %^C %^I ],
                                     %^%(s%) %^I %@RB ' _ %@MB;
!
! lAr deletion
!
!
! If there are multiple morphemes in a sequence with surface 
! form lAr or lArI following each other, only one survives on the surface.
!

define DeleteLAR  l %^A r -> 0 || Boundary _ Boundary+ l %^A r 
              .o. l %^A r -> 0 || Boundary l %^A r (%^I) Boundary+ _ 
              .o. l %^A r -> 0 || Boundary l %^A r %@MB %^%(s%) (%^I) %@MB+ _ ;


!
! `n' insertion after (s) / larI (y) -> (n)
!
!
! After (s)I and larI -DA -DAn become -nDA -nDAn, (y)A becomes nA

define InsertN  %^D %^A   -> n %^D %^A,
                %^D %^A n -> n %^D %^A n,
                %^%(y%) %^A  -> n %^A,
                %^%(y%) %^I %@MB -> n %^I %@MB,
                %^C %^A  -> n %^C %^A
                || [ %^%(s%) %^I |
                     Boundary [ l %^A r %^I | k i | k ü]
                   ] [Boundary|AposSym]+ _ ;

!
! DelS
!
! Delete (s) after a few marked nouns. The well known example is cami
! -> cami-i (p3s or compn). Yet, this deletion in current language
! seems to be optional ((as of 2009-10-21 google finds
! more `camisi' than `camii'). Better course of action seems to be
! disregarding this alternation during generation.
!

define DelS %^%(s%) (->) 0 || %@DELS%@ IntSym* _ 
    .o. %@DELS%@ -> 0;

!
! Pronoun Exceptions
!
!
! The stuff below in the order composed:
!   . before dative marker `ben' and `sen' become `ban-a' and `san-a'
!   . o/bu/şu before plural and case markers an `n' is inserted
!   . o/bu/şu before 1st/2nd person possessive suffixes a `y' is inserted
!   . after listed pronouns, before (y)lA, surface form of the genitive 
!     suffix  is inserted (this is about form, it is not the genitive marker)
!     this is normally the rule, a large number of speaker do not follow it.
!     again, it may be a good idea to restrict generation on this one.
!   . genitive marker after ben/biz becomes -Im instead of -(n)In.
!   . locative pronouns ora/bura/sura/nere optionally loose their 
!     last vowel if they precede -DA and -DAn, and less frequently -(y)A. 
!     this is another case where generations should take only one of
!     the options (not deleting the vowel is the correct written form, in
!     colloquial deletion is more common for -DA and -DAn)
!     

define PronounExceptions  e -> a || .#. [b|s] _ n %@RB %^%(y%) %^A %@MB 
                      .o. [..] -> n || .#. [ {o}  |
                                             {bu} |
                                             {şu}
                                           ] %@RB Boundary*
                                       _
                                           [ l %^A (r)          |
                                             %^%(y%) %^I        |
                                             %^%(y%) %^A        |
                                             %^D %^A n          |
                                             %^%(y%) l %^A      |
                                             %^D %^A 
                                           ] %@MB
                      .o. [..] -> y || .#. [ {o}  |
                                             {bu} |
                                             {şu}
                                           ] Boundary+
                                       _
                                           [ %^%(I%) m       |
                                             %^%(I%) n       |
                                             %^%(I%) m %^I z |
                                             %^%(I%) n %^I z 
                                           ] %@MB
                      .o. [..] (->) %^%(n%) %^I n || .#. [ {ben} | 
                                                           {sen} |
                                                           {o}   | 
                                                           {biz} | 
                                                           {siz} | 
                                                           {bu}  | 
                                                           {şu}
                                                         ] Boundary+ (n)
                                                     _
                                                        %^%(y%) l %^A %@MB
                      .o. n -> m || .#. [{ben}|{biz}] Boundary+ %^%(n%) %^I _  
                      .o. [a|e] (->) 0 || .#. [{bur}|{şur}|{or}|{ner}] _
                                        %@RB [%^D %^A (n) | %^%(y%) %^A] %@MB 
                      .o. %^%(y%) -> y || .#. [{bur}|{şur}|{or}|{ner}] %@RB _ %^A %@MB ;

!
! InsertY
!
!
! The symbol `y'  is inserted after some words, particularly 
! ones that end with `su' and before the suffixes that start with 
! (n), (y) or (I) (genitive and possessive suffixes except p3p).
! For some words, this insertion seems to be optional for some 
! speakers/registers, e.g., `ne-y-imiz' is the common/correct form but 
! `ne-miz' is also used relatively frequently.


define insertYwords     {su}|{özsu}|{karasu} ;
define insertYoptional  {ne}|{akarsu}|{Akarsu} ;

define InsertY  [..] -> y || insertYwords %@RB _ [%^%(I%) | %^%(n%) | %^%(s%)]
            .o. [..] (->) y || insertYoptional %@RB _ [ %^%(I%) | %^%(n%) | %^%(s%)] ;


!
! Delete buffer y after i-
!

define iDeleteY %^%(y%) -> 0 || .#. i %@RB _ ;

!
! `N' before  passive morpheme
!
!
! after a limited set of verbal roots, and optional `n' is inserted
! before passive morpheme

define wordsPassiveN {de}|{ye}|{yaşa}|{kapa}|{boya}|{söyle};
define NbeforePassive [..] (->) n ||  .#. wordsPassiveN %@RB 
                                     _ %^%(I%) %@LN %@MB ;

!
! Replace intermediate symbol @LN on passive according to preceding context
!
!
! The passive morpheme is -(I)n if the preceding letter is `l' or a 
! vowel -(I)n otherwise. We also add a few more exceptional cases here.
! Namely,
!       - in the passive form of the verb stems ending with `koy'
!          `y' becomes `n' optionally (generally preferred). 
!       - the passive form of `kapa' is `kapatıl'. Note that with the
!         above exception, this makes it ambiguous between 'kapatıl' 
!         and `kapanıl'. 
!           TODO: not completely convinced that `kapanır' is not another 
!                 option
!       - the passive form of `anla' is `anlaşıl'
!
!

define PassiveLN  y (->) n  || k o _ %@RB  %^%(I%) %@LN %@MB
              .o. [..] -> t || .#. {kapa} %@RB _ %^%(I%) %@LN %@MB
              .o. [..] -> ş || .#. {anla} %@RB _ %^%(I%) %@LN %@MB
              .o. %@LN -> n || [Vall | l] IntSym* %^%(I%) _ %@MB
              .o. %@LN -> l ;
